Utah statutes.
16-16-105.   Purpose and duration of limited cooperative association.

(1)  A limited cooperative association is an entity distinct from its members.

(2)  A limited cooperative association may be organized for any lawful purpose, whether or not for profit, except for the operation of a financial institution as defined in Section 7-1-103.

(3)  Unless the articles of organization state a term for a limited cooperative association's existence, the association has perpetual duration.

